Utah statutes.
31A-7-103.   Applicability of other provisions.
(1)  Except for exemptions specifically granted under this title, nonprofit
health service insurance corporations organized or operating under this
chapter are subject to all of the provisions of this title.
(2)  Nonprofit health service corporations are exempt from the provisions of
Chapter 5 except where sections or parts are specifically referenced and made
applicable in this chapter, in which case the referenced provisions under
Chapter 5 that apply to mutual corporations apply to nonprofit health service
insurance corporations.
(3)  Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, and Title
16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, do not apply to
nonprofit health service insurance corporations except as specifically made
applicable by:
(a)  this chapter;
(b)  a provision adopted by reference under this chapter; or
(c)  a rule adopted by the commissioner to deal with corporate law issues of
nonprofit health service insurance corporations which are not settled under
this chapter.
(4)  Any insurer authorized under this chapter that is not in compliance with
the applicable capital and surplus requirements, yet has assets in excess of
its liabilities, has until July 1, 1988, to comply with the applicable capital
and surplus requirements.  One-half of any shortage in capital and surplus on
July 1, 1986, shall be remedied by July 1, 1987.
